Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1232.
do enact as follows:AB1232,13Section 1. 36.27 (2) (cr) of the statutes is created to read:AB1232,2,2136.27 (2) (cr) A person is entitled to the exemption under par. (a) if that person 2meets all of the following requirements:AB1232,2,531. The person has resided in this state for 12 months immediately preceding 4the beginning of any semester or session in which the person registers at an 5institution.AB1232,2,862. The person is in approved deferred action status pursuant to the deferred 7action for childhood arrivals program of the federal department of homeland 8security.AB1232,29Section 2. Initial applicability.AB1232,2,1110(1) This act first applies to persons who enroll for the semester or session 11following the effective date of this subsection.AB1232,2,1212